New Jersey, session 222, S2723.
Be It Enacted by the Senate and General Assembly of the State of New Jersey: 1.  There is appropriated from the General Fund $125,000,000 to the "New Jersey Affordable Housing Trust Fund," for the purpose of awarding grants and loans for housing projects and programs in municipalities for which fair share plans and housing elements have obtained compliance certification, and for other purposes authorized pursuant to section 20 of P.L.1985, c.222 (C.52:27D-320). 2.  This act shall take effect immediately.